Colorado, session 2026A, HB1321.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-33.5-1810,
amend (1)(c) introductory portion, (1)(c)(I), (1)(c)(III), (1)(c)(IV),
(2)(b), and (5) as follows:
24-33.5-1810. School security disbursement program - created
- rules - definitions - repeal.
(1) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(c) "Eligible nonprofit organization" means a COLORADO-BASED
nonprofit organization that is exempt from taxation under section 501
(c)(3) of the federal "Internal Revenue Code of 1986", as amended, that
applies to work with specific local education providers or first responders,
and that:
(I) Has experience providing training for school safety incident
response, VIOLENCE PREVENTION, OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH;
(III) Has experience working with school districts, school
personnel, and students on issues related to school safety incident
response, and VIOLENCE PREVENTION, OR BEHAVIORAL HEALTH; AND
(IV) Identifies in its application local education providers, LOCAL
LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, or OTHER LOCAL first responders that will
participate in school safety incident response training or programs.

(2) (b) Subject to available appropriations, the department shall
disburse money to applicants as provided in subsection (5) of this section
-2- 1321

from money credited to the school security disbursement cash fund,
created in section 24-33.5-1811. It is the intent of the general assembly
that the department distribute the money credited to the school security
disbursement cash fund as quickly as practicable based on the receipt of
qualifying applications. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DISBURSE ALL GRANT
MONEY AWARDED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION FOR USE IN THE UPCOMING
SCHOOL YEAR NO LATER THAN AUGUST 1 OF THAT CALENDAR YEAR.
(5) The department shall review each application received
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section. Subject to available
appropriations, the department shall disburse money to the applicant if the
department determines that the application meets the requirements
specified in subsection (4) of this section and the purpose or purposes for
which the applicant intends to use the disbursed money are likely to
improve security in public school facilities or vehicles and are not likely
to exacerbate identified student disciplinary disparities. The department
shall give priority to applicants that commit to providing financial
resources to match the amount of the disbursement OR COMMIT TO
PROVIDING THEIR TRAINING TO LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDERS, LOCAL LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, AND OTHER LOCAL FIRST RESPONDERS AT NO
CHARGE. The department shall determine the disbursement amount taking
into account the amount identified in the application.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
-3- 1321

within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-4- 1321